test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-osi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - ôsi - ok : # -m animate noun
     ôsi+N+IN+Sg: ôsi
     ôsi+N+IN+Pl: ôsa
     ôsi+N+IN+Loc: [ôsihk, ôtihk]
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg: [ôsis, ôcis]
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl: [ôsisa, ôcisa]
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Loc: [ôsisihk, ôcisihk]

     ôsi+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: [nitôs, nitôt]
     ôsi+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: [kitôs, kitôt]
     ôsi+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: [otôs, otôt]
     ôsi+N+IN+Sg+Px3iSg: [otôsiyiw, otôtiyiw] 
     ôsi+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: [nitôsinân, nitôtinân]
     ôsi+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: [kitôsinaw, kitôtinaw]
     ôsi+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: [kitôsiwâw, kitôtiwâw]
     ôsi+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: [otôsiwâw, otôtiwâw]
     ôsi+N+IN+Sg+Px3iPl: [otôsiyiw, otôtiyiw]

     ôsi+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: [nitôsa, nitôta]
     ôsi+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: [kitôsa, kitôta]
     ôsi+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: [otôsa, otôta]
     ôsi+N+IN+Pl+Px3iSg: [otôsiyiwa, otôtiyiwa]
     ôsi+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: [nitôsinâna, nitôtinâna]
     ôsi+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: [kitôsinawa, kitôtinawa]
     ôsi+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: [kitôsiwâwa, kitôtiwâwa]
     ôsi+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: [otôsiwâwa, otôtiwâwa]
     ôsi+N+IN+Pl+Px3iPl: [otôsiyiwa, otôtiyiwa]

     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: [nitôsis, nitôcis]
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: [kitôsis, kitôcis]
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: [otôsis, otôcis]
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3iSg: [otôsisiyiw, otôcisiyiw]
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: [nitôsisinân, nitôcisinân]
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: [kitôsisinaw, kitôcisinaw]
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: [kitôsisiwâw, kitôcisiwâw]
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: [otôsisiwâw, otôcisiwâw]
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3iPl: [otôsisiyiw, otôcisiyiw]

     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px1Sg: [nitôsisa, nitôcisa]
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px2Sg: [kitôsisa, kitôcisa]
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px3Sg: [otôsisa, otôcisa]
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px3iSg: [otôsisiyiwa, otôcisiyiwa]
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px1Pl: [nitôsisinâna, nitôcisinâna]
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px12Pl: [kitôsisinawa, kitôcisinawa]
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px2Pl: [kitôsisiwâwa, kitôcisiwâwa]
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px3Pl: [otôsisiwâwa, otôcisiwâwa]
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Pl+Px3iPl: [otôsisiyiwa, otôcisiyiwa]

     ôsi+N+IN+Px1Sg+Loc: [nitôsihk, nitôtihk]
     ôsi+N+IN+Px2Sg+Loc: [kitôsihk, kitôtihk]
     ôsi+N+IN+Px3Sg+Loc: [otôsihk, otôtihk]
     ôsi+N+IN+Px3iSg+Loc: [otôsiyihk, otôtiyihk]
     ôsi+N+IN+Px1Pl+Loc: [nitôsinânihk, nitôtinânihk]
     ôsi+N+IN+Px12Pl+Loc: [kitôsinâhk, kitôtinâhk]
     ôsi+N+IN+Px2Pl+Loc: [kitôsiwâwihk, kitôtiwâwihk]
     ôsi+N+IN+Px3Pl+Loc: [otôsiwâwihk, otôtiwâwihk]
     ôsi+N+IN+Px3iPl+Loc: [otôsiyihk, otôtiyihk]

     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px1Sg+Loc: [nitôsisihk, nitôcisihk]
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px2Sg+Loc: [kitôsisihk, kitôcisihk]
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px3Sg+Loc: [otôsisihk, otôcisihk]
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px3iSg+Loc: [otôsisiyihk, otôcisiyihk]
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px1Pl+Loc: [nitôsisinânihk, nitôcisinânihk]
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px12Pl+Loc: [kitôsisinâhk, kitôcisinâhk]
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px2Pl+Loc: [kitôsisiwâwihk, kitôcisiwâwihk]
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px3Pl+Loc: [otôsisiwâwihk, otôcisiwâwihk]
     ôsi+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Px3iPl+Loc: [otôsisiyihk, otôcisiyihk]
